Ohio, session 136, SB8.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4117.091 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 4117.091. (A) No public employer shall provide, or 7
agree to a provision in a collective bargaining agreement that 8
provides, paid leave or any other form of compensation for a 9
public employee to engage in either of the following activities: 10
(1) Political activities performed by, or on behalf of, an 11
employee organization that involve advocating for the election 12
or defeat of any political candidate; 13
(2) Lobbying activities performed by, or on behalf of, an 14
employee organization that involve attempting to influence the 15
passage or defeat of federal or state legislation, local 16
ordinances, or any ballot measure. 17
(B) Division (A) of this section does not prohibit a 18

S. B. No. 8 Page 2
As Introduced
public employer from allowing, or agreeing to a provision in a 19
collective bargaining agreement that allows, a public employee 20
to use accrued personal leave, or any other type of leave that 21
the employee is permitted to use for any purpose, for the 22
purpose of engaging in the activities described in divisions (A) 23
(1) and (2) of this section. 24
(C) A provision of an agreement that violates division (A) 25
of this section is against public policy and is void and 26
unenforceable. 27
Section 2. This act applies to collective bargaining 28
agreements entered into under Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code 29
on or after the effective date of this section. 30